Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors

Effective date. —

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.

§ 17-29-501.
Nature of transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-502.
Transfer of transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

Is permissible;

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, does not by itself cause a member’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the limited liability company’s activities; and

Subject to W.S.

17-29-504

, does not entitle the transferee to:

Participate in the management or conduct of the company’s activities; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, have access to records or other information concerning the company’s activities.

A transferee has the right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled.

In a dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company, a transferee is entitled to an account of the company’s transactions only from the date of dissolution.

A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by the limited liability company in a record, and, subject to this section, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

A limited liability company need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the company has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the operating agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S. 17-29-602(a)(iv)(B), when a member transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a member other than the interest in distributions transferred and retains all duties and obligations of a member.

When a member transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a member with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the member’s obligations under W.S.

17-29-403

and 17-29-406(c) known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a member.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-503.
Charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a member or transferee, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. A charging order requires the limited liability company to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that would otherwise be paid to the judgment debtor.

Reserved.

Reserved.

The member or transferee whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection (a) of this section may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

A limited liability company or one (1) or more members whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

This article does not deprive any member or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member’s or transferee’s transferable interest.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking to enforce a judgment against a judgment debtor, including any judgment debtor who may be the sole member, dissociated member or transferee, may, in the capacity of the judgment creditor, satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor’s transferable interest or from the assets of the limited liability company. Other remedies, including foreclosure on the judgment debtor’s limited liability interest and a court order for directions, accounts and inquiries that the judgment debtor might have made are not available to the judgment creditor attempting to satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited liability company and may not be ordered by the court.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.

§ 17-29-504.
Power of personal representative of deceased member.

If a member dies, the deceased member’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in W.S. 17-29-502(c) and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current member under W.S.

17-29-410

.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 94, § 1.